Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0263.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "state employee critical shortage retention program act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Qualified employee" means any of the following: (i) A conservation officer as that term is defined in section 1b of the state employee's retirement act, 1943 PA 240, MCL 38.1b. (ii) A position in the classified civil service with a classification of any of the following: (A) A position described in section 45(a)(i) or (iv) of the state employee's retirement act, 1943 PA 240, MCL 38.45. (B) Corrections resident representative. (C) Corrections transportation officer. (D) Special alternative incarceration officer. (iii) A state police motor carrier or Michigan state police properties securities officer. (b) "Qualified employer" means any of the following, as applicable: (i) The department of state police. (ii) The department of corrections. (iii) The department of health and human services. (iv) The department of natural resources. (v) The department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. Sec. 5. (1) A qualified employer shall pay, as a bonus payment, to a qualified employee as follows: (a) If the qualified employee completes 2 years of service during the period that begins on the effective date of this act and before September 30, 2026, $5,000.00. (b) If the qualified employee completes 2 years of service as described in subdivision (a), an additional $5,000.00 if the qualified employee completes an additional 2 years of service before September 30, 2028. (2) A bonus payment made by a qualified employer under this act must not exceed $10,000.00. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 262 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.